Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE E. OTHER EXECUTIVE AGENCIES AND PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 468. STATE DEMOGRAPHER

Sec. 468.001. DEFINITION. In this section, "state agency" means a department, commission, board, office, or other agency in the executive branch of state government, including a university system or institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 468.002. DESIGNATION OF STATE DEMOGRAPHER. (a) The governor shall appoint an employee or officer of a state agency as the state demographer from a list submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives and the lieutenant governor.

(b) To be eligible for designation as state demographer, a person must have:

(1) a graduate degree with specialization in demography or a closely related field of study; and

(2) extensive experience in employing demographic and related socioeconomic data for use by legislative, public, and private entities.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 468.003. PERSONNEL AND FACILITIES. (a) The state agency that employs the person designated as the state demographer shall provide:

(1) staff necessary for the state demographer to perform the demographer's duties; and

(2) the main office for the state demographer.

(b) The Texas Legislative Council shall provide office space and other support in Austin necessary for the state demographer to perform the demographer's duties for the legislature.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 468.004. POWERS AND DUTIES.The state demographer shall:

(1) disseminate demographic and related socioeconomic data to the public, with emphasis on data that may be useful to public policymakers;

(2) provide annual population estimates for all counties and municipalities in the state;

(3) provide biennial population projections for the state and all counties of the state;

(4) adhere to current standards of practice when determining which racial/ethnic groups to include in estimates and projections;

(5) provide information by request which justifies the omission of any particular racial/ethnic group from estimates and projections, including limitations of data and methodology;

(6) provide information to the legislature relating to the impact that demographic and socioeconomic changes in the population of the state have on the demand for state services; and

(7) evaluate the type and quality of data needed to:

(A) adequately monitor demographic and socioeconomic changes in the population of the state; and

(B) assess the effectiveness of delivery of state services.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 569 (H.B. 3255), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 468.005. ADMINISTRATOR OF THE UNITED STATES BUREAU OF THE CENSUS FEDERAL-STATE COOPERATIVE. The state agency that employs the state demographer shall serve as the official cognizant administrator for the State of Texas of the United States Bureau of the Census federal-state cooperative program for population estimates and the federal-state cooperative program for population projections and as coordinating agency for the State Data Center program.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 529, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1993. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 88.214 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.